Utah statutes.
59-7-106 (Superseded 01/01/11).   Subtractions from unadjusted income.
In computing adjusted income the following amounts shall be subtracted from
unadjusted income:
(1)  the foreign dividend gross-up included in gross income for federal income
tax purposes under Section 78, Internal Revenue Code;
(2)  the net capital loss, as defined for federal purposes, if the taxpayer
elects to deduct the loss on the current Utah return.  The deduction shall be
made by claiming the deduction on the current Utah return which shall be filed
by the due date of the return, including extensions.  For the purposes of this
Subsection (2) all capital losses in a given year must be:
(a)  deducted in the year incurred; or
(b)  carried forward as provided in Sections 1212(a)(1)(B) and (C), Internal
Revenue Code;
(3)  the decrease in salary expense deduction for federal income tax purposes
due to claiming the federal jobs credit under Section 51, Internal Revenue
Code;
(4)  the decrease in qualified research and basic research expense deduction
for federal income tax purposes due to claiming the federal research and
development credit under Section 41, Internal Revenue Code;
(5)  the decrease in qualified clinical testing expense deduction for federal
income tax purposes due to claiming the federal orphan drug credit under
Section 28, Internal Revenue Code;
(6)  any decrease in any expense deduction for federal income tax purposes due
to claiming any other federal credit;
(7)  the safe harbor lease adjustment required under Subsections
59-7-111(1)(b) and (2)(b);
(8)  any income on the federal corporate return that has been previously taxed
by Utah;
(9)  amounts included in federal taxable income that are due to refunds of
taxes imposed for the privilege of doing business, or exercising a corporate
franchise, including income, franchise, corporate stock and business and
occupation taxes paid by the corporation to Utah, another state of the United
States, a foreign country, a United States possession, or the Commonwealth of
Puerto Rico to the extent that the taxes were added to unadjusted income under
Section 59-7-105;
(10)  charitable contributions, to the extent allowed as a subtraction under
Section 59-7-109;
(11) (a)  50% of the dividends deemed received or received from subsidiaries
which are members of the unitary group and are organized or incorporated
outside of the United States unless such subsidiaries are included in a
combined report under Section 59-7-402 or 59-7-403.  In arriving at the amount
of the dividend exclusion, the taxpayer shall first deduct from the dividends
deemed received or received, the expense directly attributable to those
dividends.  Interest expense attributable to excluded dividends shall be
determined by multiplying interest expense by a fraction, the numerator of
which is the taxpayer's average investment in such dividend paying
subsidiaries, and the denominator of which is the taxpayer's average total
investment in assets;
(b)  in determining income apportionable to this state, a portion of the
factors of a foreign subsidiary whose dividends are partially excluded under
Subsection (11)(a) shall be included in the combined report factors.  The
portion to be included shall be determined by multiplying each factor of the
foreign subsidiary by a fraction, but not to exceed 100%, the numerator of
which is the amount of the dividend paid by the foreign subsidiary which is
included in adjusted income, and the denominator of which is the current year
earnings and profits of the foreign subsidiary as determined under the
Internal Revenue Code;
(12) (a)  50% of the adjusted income of a foreign operating company unless the
taxpayer has elected to file a worldwide combined report as provided in
Section 59-7-403.  For purposes of this Subsection (12), when calculating the
adjusted income of a foreign operating company, a foreign operating company
may not deduct the subtractions allowable under this Subsection (12) and
Subsection (11);
(b)  in determining income apportionable to this state, the factors for a
foreign operating company shall be included in the combined report factors in
the same percentage its adjusted income is included in the combined adjusted
income;
(13)  the amount of gain or loss which is included in unadjusted income but
not recognized for federal purposes on stock sold or exchanged by a member of
a selling consolidated group as defined in Section 338, Internal Revenue Code,
if an election has been made pursuant to Section 338(h)(10), Internal Revenue
Code;
(14)  the amount of gain or loss which is included in unadjusted income but
not recognized for federal purposes on stock sold, exchanged, or distributed
by a corporation pursuant to Section 336(e), Internal Revenue Code, if an
election under Section 336(e), Internal Revenue Code, has been made for
federal purposes;
(15) (a)  adjustments to gains, losses, depreciation expense, amortization
expense, and similar items due to a difference between basis for federal
purposes and basis as computed under Section 59-7-107; and
(b)  if there has been a reduction in federal basis for a federal tax credit
where there is no corresponding Utah tax credit, the amount of the reduction
in basis shall be allowed as an expense in the year of the federal credit;
(16)  any interest expense not deducted on the federal corporate return under
Section 265(b) or 291(e), Internal Revenue Code;
(17)  100% of the dividends received from subsidiaries which are insurance
companies exempt from this chapter under Subsection 59-7-102(1)(c) and are
under common ownership;
(18)  subject to Subsection 59-7-105(12), the amount of a qualified investment
as defined in Section 53B-8a-102 that:
(a)  a corporation that is an account owner as defined in Section 53B-8a-102
makes during the taxable year;
(b)  the corporation described in Subsection (18)(a) does not deduct on a
federal corporation income tax return; and
(c)  does not exceed the maximum amount of the qualified investment that may
be subtracted from unadjusted income for a taxable year in accordance with
Subsection 53B-8a-106(1); and
(19)  for purposes of income included in a combined report under Part 4,
Combined Reporting, the entire amount of the dividends a member of a unitary
group receives or is considered to receive from a captive real estate
investment trust.
